New Jersey, session 222, S1080.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.  As used in this section: Aquaculture means the same as defined in section 3 of P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-3). Octopus means a cephalopod mollusk with a soft body and eight limbs belonging to the order Octopoda, and does not include wild caught octopuses or octopuses propagated, cultivated, maintained, reared, or harvested only for research purposes unrelated to commercial production. b.    No person shall engage in the aquaculture of any species of octopus in the State for the purpose of human consumption. c.     No business entity shall sell, possess, or transport any species of octopus in the State that is the result or product of aquaculture. d.  A person who violates any provision of this section, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, shall be subject, upon order of a court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per day of the violation, and each day during which the violation continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.  Any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection may be collected with costs in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.), or may be collected in a civil action commenced by the Secretary of Agriculture.  In addition to any penalties, costs or interest charges, the Superior Court, or the municipal court as the case may be, may assess against the violator the amount of economic benefit accruing to the violator from the violation. e.  The Secretary of Agriculture may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.